src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-nohkowa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - nohkówa - ok : # -m animate noun, my son AEW NA1
     nohkówa+NAD+Px1Sg+Sg: nohkówa
     nohkówa+NAD+Px1Sg+Pl: nohkóíksi
     nohkówa+NAD+Px1Sg+Obv: nohkóyi
     nohkówa+NAD+Px1Sg+Non: nohkóí
     
     nohkówa+NAD+Px1Pl+Sg: nohkóínnaana
     nohkówa+NAD+Px1Pl+Pl: nohkóínnaaniksi
     nohkówa+NAD+Px1Pl+Obv: nohkóínnaani
     nohkówa+NAD+Px1Pl+Non: nohkóínnaani

     nohkówa+NAD+Px21Pl+Sg: kohkóínnoona
     nohkówa+NAD+Px21Pl+Pl: kohkóínnooniksi
     nohkówa+NAD+Px21Pl+Obv: kohkóínnooni
     nohkówa+NAD+Px21Pl+Non: kohkóínnooni

     nohkówa+NAD+Px2Sg+Sg: kohkówa
     nohkówa+NAD+Px2Sg+Pl: kohkóíksi
     nohkówa+NAD+Px2Sg+Obv: kohkóyi
     nohkówa+NAD+Px2Sg+Non: kohkóí

     nohkówa+NAD+Px2Pl+Sg: kohkówaawa
     nohkówa+NAD+Px2Pl+Pl: kohkówaawaiksi
     nohkówa+NAD+Px2Pl+Obv: kohkówaawayi
     nohkówa+NAD+Px2Pl+Non: kohkówaawai

     nohkówa+NAD+Px3Sg+Obv: ohkóyi
     nohkówa+NAD+Px3Sg+Non: ohkóí

     nohkówa+NAD+Px3Pl+Obv: ohkówaawayi
     nohkówa+NAD+Px3Pl+Non: ohkówaawaí

    
